Hawaii statutes.
[§87A-25] Other duties. The board
shall:

(1) Authorize charges and payments from the fund only
upon vouchers countersigned by the chairperson and any other person designated
by the board;

(2) Maintain accurate records and accounts of all
financial transactions of the fund that shall be audited annually and
summarized in an annual report to the governor and legislature;

(3) Maintain suitable and adequate records and
provide information requested by State and county employers as necessary to
carry out the purpose of the fund;

(4) Procure fiduciary liability insurance and error
and omissions coverage for all trustees; and

(5) Procure a fidelity bond of a reasonable amount
for the chairperson and any other person authorized to handle fund moneys. [L
2001, c 88, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next